Missouri, session 2026, HB2928.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.111, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.111, to read as follows:
571.111. 1. An applicant for a concealed carry permit shall demonstrate knowledge
of firearms safety training. This requirement shall be fully satisfied if the applicant for a
concealed carry permit:
(1) Submits a photocopy of a certificate of firearms safety training course completion,
as defined in subsection 2 of this section, signed by a qualified firearms safety instructor as
defined in subsection 6 of this section; or
(2) Submits a photocopy of a certificate that shows the applicant completed a firearms
safety course given by or under the supervision of any state, county, municipal, or federal law
enforcement agency; or
(3) Is a qualified firearms safety instructor as defined in subsection 6 of this section;
or
(4) Submits proof that the applicant currently holds any type of valid peace officer
license issued under the requirements of chapter 590; or
(5) Submits proof that the applicant is currently allowed to carry firearms in
accordance with the certification requirements of section 217.710; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2928 2
(6) Submits proof that the applicant is currently certified as any class of corrections
officer by the Missouri department of corrections and has passed at least one eight-hour
firearms training course, approved by the director of the Missouri department of corrections
under the authority granted to him or her, that includes instruction on the justifiable use of
force as prescribed in chapter 563; or
(7) Submits a photocopy of a certificate of firearms safety training course completion
that was issued on August 27, 2011, or earlier so long as the certificate met the requirements
of subsection 2 of this section that were in effect on the date it was issued.
2. A certificate of firearms safety training course completion may be issued to any
applicant by any qualified firearms safety instructor. On the certificate of course completion
the qualified firearms safety instructor shall affirm that the individual receiving instruction
has taken and passed a firearms safety course of at least eight hours in length taught by the
instructor that included:
(1) Handgun safety in the classroom, at home, on the firing range and while carrying
the firearm;
(2) A physical demonstration performed by the applicant that demonstrated his or her
ability to safely load and unload either a revolver or a semiautomatic pistol and demonstrated
his or her marksmanship with either firearm;
(3) The basic principles of marksmanship;
(4) Care and cleaning of concealable firearms;
(5) Safe storage of firearms at home;
(6) The requirements of this state for obtaining a concealed carry permit from the
sheriff of the individual's county of residence;
(7) The laws relating to firearms as prescribed in this chapter;
(8) The laws relating to the justifiable use of force as prescribed in chapter 563;
(9) A live firing exercise of sufficient duration for each applicant to fire either a
revolver or a semiautomatic pistol, from a standing position or its equivalent, a minimum of
twenty rounds from the handgun at a distance of seven yards from a B-27 silhouette target or
an equivalent target;
(10) A live-fire test administered to the applicant while the instructor was present of
twenty rounds from either a revolver or a semiautomatic pistol from a standing position or its
equivalent at a distance from a B-27 silhouette target, or an equivalent target, of seven yards.
3. A certificate of firearms safety training course completion may also be issued to an
applicant who presents proof to a qualified firearms safety instructor that the applicant has
passed a regular or online course on firearm safety conducted by an instructor certified by the
National Rifle Association that is at least one hour in length and who also passes the
requirements of subdivisions (1), (2), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of subsection 2 of this section

HB 2928 3
in a course, not restricted by a period of hours, that is taught by a qualified firearms safety
instructor.
4. A qualified firearms safety instructor shall not give a grade of passing to an
applicant for a concealed carry permit who:
(1) Does not follow the orders of the qualified firearms instructor or cognizant range
officer; or
(2) Handles a firearm in a manner that, in the judgment of the qualified firearm safety
instructor, poses a danger to the applicant or to others; or
(3) During the live-fire testing portion of the course fails to hit the silhouette portion
of the targets with at least fifteen rounds.
5. Qualified firearms safety instructors who provide firearms safety instruction to any
person who applies for a concealed carry permit shall:
(1) Make the applicant's course records available upon request to the sheriff of the
county in which the applicant resides;
(2) Maintain all course records on students for a period of no less than four years
from course completion date; and
(3) Not have more than forty students per certified instructor in the classroom portion
of the course or more than five students per range officer engaged in range firing.
6. A firearms safety instructor shall be considered to be a qualified firearms safety
instructor by any sheriff issuing a concealed carry permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to
571.121 if the instructor:
(1) Is a valid firearms safety instructor certified by the National Rifle Association
holding a rating as a personal protection instructor or pistol marksmanship instructor; or
(2) Submits a photocopy of a notarized certificate from a firearms safety instructor's
course offered by a local, state, or federal governmental agency; or
(3) Submits a photocopy of a notarized certificate from a firearms safety instructor
course approved by the department of public safety; or
(4) Has successfully completed a firearms safety instructor course given by or under
the supervision of any state, county, municipal, or federal law enforcement agency; or
(5) Is a certified police officer firearms safety instructor; or
(6) Is a valid firearms instructor certified by the United States Concealed Carry
Association (USCCA).
7. Any firearms safety instructor qualified under subsection 6 of this section may
submit a copy of a training instructor certificate, course outline bearing the notarized
signature of the instructor, and a recent photograph of the instructor to the sheriff of the
county in which the instructor resides. The sheriff shall review the training instructor
certificate along with the course outline and verify the firearms safety instructor is qualified

HB 2928 4
and the course meets the requirements provided under this section. If the sheriff verifies the
firearms safety instructor is qualified and the course meets the requirements provided under
this section, the sheriff shall collect an annual registration fee of ten dollars from each
qualified instructor who chooses to submit such information and submit the registration to the
Missouri sheriff methamphetamine relief taskforce. The Missouri sheriff methamphetamine
relief taskforce, or its designated agent, shall create and maintain a statewide database of
qualified instructors. This information shall be a closed record except for access by any
sheriff. Firearms safety instructors may register annually and the registration is only effective
for the calendar year in which the instructor registered. Any sheriff may access the statewide
database maintained by the Missouri sheriff methamphetamine relief taskforce to verify the
100 firearms safety instructor is qualified and the course offered by the instructor meets the
101 requirements provided under this section. Unless a sheriff has reason to believe otherwise, a
102 sheriff shall presume a firearms safety instructor is qualified to provide firearms safety
103 instruction in counties throughout the state under this section if the instructor is registered on
104 the statewide database of qualified instructors.
105 8. Any firearms safety instructor who knowingly provides any sheriff with any false
106 information concerning an applicant's performance on any portion of the required training and
107 qualification shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor. A violation of the provisions of this
108 section shall result in the person being prohibited from instructing concealed carry permit
109 classes and issuing certificates.
✔